Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio (CLUES) to address employment, economic, and technology access disparities for low-income unemployed or underemployed individuals. Funds must support short-term certifications and transferable skills in high-demand fields, workforce readiness, customized financial capability, and employment supports. At least 50 percent of this amount must be used for programming targeted at greater Minnesota. These are onetime appropriations. new text end